Hawaii statutes.
§145-5 Reports of consignment sales.
Every commission merchant shall make a written report to the producer for farm
produce handled on consignment in behalf of said producer which shall be within
such time and in such detail as may be prescribed by the department. Making a
false or incorrect report shall constitute a misdemeanor under section 145-12.
[L 1951, c 74, pt of §1; RL 1955, §23-5; HRS §145-5; am L 1972, c 39, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next